Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.060

Policies to support children of incarcerated parents.

(1)(a) The secretary shall review current department policies and assess the adequacy and availability of programs targeted at persons who receive assistance who are the children and families of a person who is incarcerated in a department of corrections facility. Great attention shall be focused on programs and policies affecting foster youth who have a parent who is incarcerated.

(b) The secretary shall adopt policies that support the children of incarcerated parents and meet their needs with the goal of facilitating normal child development, while reducing intergenerational incarceration.

(2) The secretary shall conduct the following activities to assist in implementing the requirements of subsection (1) of this section:

(a) Gather information and data on the recipients of assistance who are the children and families of inmates incarcerated in department of corrections facilities; and

(b) Participate in the children of incarcerated parents advisory committee and report information obtained under this section to the advisory committee.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 203; 2007 c 384 s 4. Formerly RCW 43.215.065.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Intent—Finding—2007 c 384: See note following RCW 72.09.495.